Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7303
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Let Them Grow Act:

(1) Biological sex means the biological indication of male and female in the context of reproductive potential or capacity, such as sex chromosomes, naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads, and nonambiguous internal and external genitalia present at birth, without regard to an individual's psychological, chosen, or subjective experience of gender;

(2) Cross-sex hormones means testosterone or other androgens given to biological females in amounts that are larger or more potent than would normally occur naturally in healthy biological sex females and estrogen given to biological males in amounts that are larger or more potent than would normally occur naturally in healthy biological sex males;

(3) Gender means the psychological, behavioral, social, and cultural aspects of being male or female;

(4) Gender-altering surgery means any medical or surgical service that seeks to surgically alter or remove healthy physical or anatomical characteristics or features that are typical for the individual's biological sex in order to instill or create physiological or anatomical characteristics that resemble a sex different from the individual's biological sex, including without limitation, genital or nongenital gender-altering surgery performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender alteration;

(5) Gender alteration means the process in which a person goes from identifying with and living as a gender that corresponds to his or her biological sex to identifying with and living as a gender different from his or her biological sex and may involve social, legal, or physical changes;

(6)(a) Gender-altering procedures includes any medical or surgical service, including without limitation physician's services, inpatient and outpatient hospital services, or prescribed drugs related to gender alteration, that seeks to:

(i) Alter or remove physical or anatomical characteristics or features that are typical for the individual's biological sex; or

(ii) Instill or create physiological or anatomical characteristics that resemble a sex different from the individual's biological sex, including without limitation medical services that provide puberty-blocking drugs, cross-sex hormones, or other mechanisms to promote the development of feminizing or masculinizing features in the opposite biological sex, or genital or nongenital gender-altering surgery performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender alteration;

(b) Gender-altering procedures does not include:

(i) Services to persons born with a medically verifiable disorder of sex development, including a person with external biological sex characteristics that are irresolvably ambiguous, such as those born with 46 XX chromosomes with virilization, 46 XY chromosomes with undervirilization, or having both ovarian and testicular tissue;

(ii) Services provided when a health care practitioner has otherwise diagnosed a disorder of sexual development that the health care practitioner has determined, through genetic or biochemical testing, that the person does not have normal sex-chromosome structure, sex-steroid production, or sex-steroid hormone action;

(iii) The acute and chronic treatment of any infection, injury, disease, or disorder that has been caused by or exacerbated by the performance of a gender-altering procedure, whether or not the gender-altering procedure was performed in accordance with state and federal law; or

(iv) Any procedure undertaken because the individual suffers from a physical disorder, physical injury, or physical illness that would, as certified by the health care practitioner, place the individual in imminent danger of death or impairment of major bodily function unless surgery is performed;

(7) Genital gender-altering surgery means a medical procedure performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender alteration, including without limitation:

(a) Surgical procedures such as penectomy, orchiectomy, vaginoplasty, clitoroplasty, or vulvoplasty for biologically male patients or hysterectomy or ovariectomy for biologically female patients;

(b) Reconstruction of the fixed part of the urethra with or without a metoidioplasty; or

(c) Phalloplasty, vaginectomy, scrotoplasty, or implantation of erection or testicular prostheses for biologically female patients;

(8) Health care practitioner means a person licensed or certified under the Uniform Credentialing Act;

(9) Puberty-blocking drugs means gonadotropin-releasing hormone analogues or other synthetic drugs used in biological males to stop luteinizing hormone secretion and therefore testosterone secretion, or synthetic drugs used in biological females which stop the production of estrogens and progesterone, when used to delay or suppress pubertal development in children for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender alteration; and

(10) Nongenital gender-altering surgery means medical procedures performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender alteration, including without limitation:

(a) Surgical procedures for biologically male patients, such as voice surgery or thyroid cartilage reduction; or

(b) Surgical procedures for biologically female patients, such as subcutaneous mastectomy or voice surgery.

Laws 2023, LB574, § 16.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.